Utah statutes.
41-6a-1204.   Trains -- Interference with vehicles limited.

A person or government agency may not operate a train in a manner to prevent vehicular use of a roadway for a period of time in excess of five consecutive minutes except:

(1)  when necessary to comply with signals affecting the safety of the movement of trains;

(2)  when necessary to avoid striking any object or person on the track;

(3)  when the train is disabled;

(4)  when the train is in motion or while engaged in switching operations;

(5)  when there is no vehicular traffic waiting to use the crossing;

(6)  when necessary to comply with a governmental safety regulation; or

(7)  as determined by a highway authority.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

